Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1147.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1167. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law under this act to the contrary, beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the board of a school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that the curriculum provided to all pupils enrolled in the school district or public school academy does not include coverage of critical race theory, the 1619 project, or any of the following anti-American and racist theories: (a) That any race is inherently superior or inferior to any other race. (b) That the United States is a fundamentally racist country. (c) That the Declaration of Independence or the United States Constitution are fundamentally racist documents. (d) That an individual's moral character or worth is determined by the individual's race. (e) That an individual, by virtue of the individual's race, is inherently racist or oppressive, whether consciously or unconsciously. (2) By not later than September 30, 2027, and by not later than September 30 of each year thereafter, the department shall identify each school district and public school academy that is in violation of subsection (1) and shall withhold 5% of the total funds due to the school district or public school academy under the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1896. (3) By not later than November 1, 2027, and by not later than November 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate standing committees responsible for education legislation that includes both of the following: (a) A list of all of the school districts and public school academies that were in noncompliance with this section for the immediately preceding school year. (b) A breakdown of school districts and public school academies that had their funding withheld under subsection (2). (4) A school district or public school academy shall not direct, or otherwise compel, pupils to personally affirm, adopt, or adhere to any of the following tenets: (a) That any sex, race, ethnicity, religion, color, or national origin is inherently superior or inferior. (b) That individuals should be adversely treated on the basis of their sex, race, ethnicity, religion, color, or national origin. (c) That individuals, by virtue of sex, race, ethnicity, religion, color, or national origin, are inherently responsible for actions committed in the past by other members of the same sex, race, ethnicity, religion, color, or national origin. (5) As used in this section: (a) "1619 project" means an initiative of The New York Times that attempts to reframe American history by regarding 1619 as America's birth year. This includes curriculum reading guides, lesson plans, activities, guided discussions, and other resources developed by the Pulitzer Center on Crisis Reporting based on the initiative described in this subdivision. (b) "Critical race theory" means anti-American and racist theories, reading guides, lesson plans, activities, guided discussions, and other resources that promote that the United States is a fundamentally racist nation, that the United States Constitution is a fundamentally racist document, and that certain races are fundamentally oppressive or oppressed.